Massachusetts, session 194th, H488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 55 of chapter 23K of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection (c), the phrase “9 per cent” and
replacing it with the following :- 4.5 per cent
SECTION 2. Section 55 of said chapter 23K of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by adding, at the end of subsection (c), after the phrase “section 60” the
following: - and 4.5 percent of its daily gross gaming revenue to the Community Preservation
Trust Fund
of 1